browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4948 Y 1
SFX 4948 0 bava .
SFX 1364 Y 1
SFX 1364 0 laria .
SFX 3426 Y 1
SFX 3426 0 egliavan .
SFX 3425 Y 1
SFX 3425 0 egliavas .
SFX 583 Y 1
SFX 583 0 lisescha .
SFX 3209 Y 1
SFX 3209 0 minadas .
SFX 3672 Y 1
SFX 3672 0 uplesch .
SFX 3645 Y 1
SFX 3645 0 vella .
SFX 1395 Y 1
SFX 1395 0 enteschan .
SFX 1394 Y 1
SFX 1394 0 enteschas .
SFX 218 Y 1
SFX 218 0 lada .
SFX 2707 Y 1
SFX 2707 0 erta .
SFX 4458 Y 1
SFX 4458 0 ladi .
SFX 241 Y 1
SFX 241 0 lads .
SFX 4729 Y 1
SFX 4729 0 erts .
SFX 3110 Y 1
SFX 3110 0 radira .
SFX 4043 Y 1
SFX 4043 0 segnia .
SFX 2541 Y 1
SFX 2541 0 oral .
SFX 4263 Y 1
SFX 4263 0 orar .
SFX 3799 Y 1
SFX 3799 0 tunadas .
SFX 2323 Y 1
SFX 2323 0 arisaziun .
SFX 3476 Y 1
SFX 3476 0 chentond .
SFX 4194 Y 1
SFX 4194 0 prias .
SFX 2561 Y 1
SFX 2561 0 metter .
SFX 2824 Y 1
SFX 2824 0 aschavan .
SFX 2823 Y 1
SFX 2823 0 aschavas .
SFX 4007 Y 1
SFX 4007 0 ssass .
SFX 3032 Y 1
SFX 3032 0 stravan .
SFX 641 Y 1
SFX 641 0 iuns .
SFX 2967 Y 1
SFX 2967 0 treschia .
SFX 3031 Y 1
SFX 3031 0 stravas .
SFX 3868 Y 1
SFX 3868 0 tom .
SFX 2985 Y 1
SFX 2985 0 ton .
SFX 2398 Y 1
SFX 2398 0 top .
SFX 2039 Y 1
SFX 2039 0 uavan .
SFX 2038 Y 1
SFX 2038 0 uavas .
SFX 2024 Y 1
SFX 2024 0 và .
SFX 1512 Y 1
SFX 1512 0 iuneschan .
SFX 1511 Y 1
SFX 1511 0 iuneschas .
SFX 232 Y 1
SFX 232 0 lain .
SFX 2963 Y 1
SFX 2963 0 tunà .
SFX 231 Y 1
SFX 231 0 lais .
SFX 2554 Y 1
SFX 2554 0 mettia .
SFX 2299 Y 1
SFX 2299 0 enteschian .
SFX 2884 Y 1
SFX 2884 0 veglia .
SFX 2298 Y 1
SFX 2298 0 enteschias .
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 0 eschan .
SFX 51 Y 1
SFX 51 0 eschas .
SFX 4004 Y 1
SFX 4004 0 ssava .
SFX 1029 Y 1
SFX 1029 0 tra .
SFX 3239 Y 1
SFX 3239 0 iura .
SFX 4471 Y 1
SFX 4471 0 iurs .
SFX 3579 Y 1
SFX 3579 0 american .
SFX 1993 Y 1
SFX 1993 0 ziunesch .
SFX 1393 Y 1
SFX 1393 0 enteschia .
SFX 3238 Y 1
SFX 3238 0 iusa .
SFX 1474 Y 1
SFX 1474 0 oric .
SFX 2760 Y 1
SFX 2760 0 divan .
SFX 2310 Y 1
SFX 2310 0 divas .
SFX 4261 Y 1
SFX 4261 0 oris .
SFX 2818 Y 1
SFX 2818 0 assicuranza .
SFX 774 Y 1
SFX 774 0 tta .
SFX 2763 Y 1
SFX 2763 0 dissan .
SFX 2762 Y 1
SFX 2762 0 dissas .
SFX 840 Y 1
SFX 840 0 ulond .
SFX 3235 Y 1
SFX 3235 0 lament .
SFX 2393 Y 1
SFX 2393 0 tum .
SFX 806 Y 1
SFX 806 0 tun .
SFX 1488 Y 1
SFX 1488 0 lant .
SFX 185 Y 1
SFX 185 0 tur .
SFX 1208 Y 1
SFX 1208 0 tus .
SFX 2052 Y 1
SFX 2052 0 tut .
SFX 1408 Y 1
SFX 1408 0 atica .
SFX 4641 Y 1
SFX 4641 0 hettadas .
SFX 3555 Y 1
SFX 3555 0 atics .
SFX 2794 Y 1
SFX 2794 0 ativas .
SFX 4796 Y 1
SFX 4796 0 egnadas .
SFX 2715 Y 1
SFX 2715 0 erescha .
SFX 2729 Y 1
SFX 2729 0 erada .
SFX 2727 Y 1
SFX 2727 0 erads .
SFX 4285 Y 1
SFX 4285 0 ognan .
SFX 1848 Y 1
SFX 1848 0 ognas .
SFX 663 Y 1
SFX 663 0 hescha .
SFX 1944 Y 1
SFX 1944 0 ariseschian .
SFX 2020 Y 1
SFX 2020 0 vegnì .
SFX 1943 Y 1
SFX 1943 0 ariseschias .
SFX 1329 Y 1
SFX 1329 0 ueschian .
SFX 1328 Y 1
SFX 1328 0 ueschias .
SFX 1510 Y 1
SFX 1510 0 iuneschia .
SFX 128 Y 1
SFX 128 0 isescha .
SFX 2669 Y 1
SFX 2669 0 ialas .
SFX 4813 Y 1
SFX 4813 0 ectai .
SFX 3442 Y 1
SFX 3442 0 ectar .
SFX 2517 Y 1
SFX 2517 0 ppond .
SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 0 eschia .
SFX 3538 Y 1
SFX 3538 0 ccada .
SFX 3536 Y 1
SFX 3536 0 ccads .
SFX 3965 Y 1
SFX 3965 0 taziuns .
SFX 2804 Y 1
SFX 2804 0 atisavan .
SFX 2803 Y 1
SFX 2803 0 atisavas .
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 0 lass .
SFX 4606 Y 1
SFX 4606 0 iclassan .
SFX 4531 Y 1
SFX 4531 0 isabladad .
SFX 4605 Y 1
SFX 4605 0 iclassas .
SFX 1981 Y 1
SFX 1981 0 zzai .
SFX 2334 Y 1
SFX 2334 0 zzan .
SFX 1978 Y 1
SFX 1978 0 zzar .
SFX 1977 Y 1
SFX 1977 0 zzas .
SFX 1038 Y 1
SFX 1038 0 tgai .
SFX 1238 Y 1
SFX 1238 0 tgan .
SFX 888 Y 1
SFX 888 0 tgar .
SFX 571 Y 1
SFX 571 0 tgas .
SFX 4895 Y 1
SFX 4895 0 chlas .
SFX 2725 Y 1
SFX 2725 0 erain .
SFX 2724 Y 1
SFX 2724 0 erais .
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 à .
SFX 3443 Y 1
SFX 3443 0 è .
SFX 1305 Y 1
SFX 1305 0 é .
SFX 72 Y 1
SFX 72 0 ì .
SFX 4757 Y 1
SFX 4757 0 ensiun .
SFX 222 Y 1
SFX 222 0 lava .
SFX 4283 Y 1
SFX 4283 0 ognian .
SFX 4282 Y 1
SFX 4282 0 ognias .
SFX 2348 Y 1
SFX 2348 0 vegnivan .
SFX 2347 Y 1
SFX 2347 0 vegnivas .
SFX 3534 Y 1
SFX 3534 0 ccain .
SFX 3533 Y 1
SFX 3533 0 ccais .
SFX 4284 Y 1
SFX 4284 0 ognia .
SFX 2368 Y 1
SFX 2368 0 vada .
SFX 4237 Y 1
SFX 4237 0 orta .
SFX 2407 Y 1
SFX 2407 0 tget .
SFX 2891 Y 1
SFX 2891 0 vads .
SFX 3670 Y 1
SFX 3670 0 upleschan .
SFX 3669 Y 1
SFX 3669 0 upleschas .
SFX 3440 Y 1
SFX 3440 0 ectiva .
SFX 4804 Y 1
SFX 4804 0 ectivs .
SFX 4547 Y 1
SFX 4547 0 imesch .
SFX 4411 Y 1
SFX 4411 0 linond .
SFX 4474 Y 1
SFX 4474 0 iunalmain .
SFX 4968 Y 1
SFX 4968 0 atina .
SFX 828 Y 1
SFX 828 0 heschian .
SFX 827 Y 1
SFX 827 0 heschias .
SFX 3202 Y 1
SFX 3202 0 minassan .
SFX 1378 Y 1
SFX 1378 0 ibladad .
SFX 3441 Y 1
SFX 3441 0 ectiv .
SFX 3201 Y 1
SFX 3201 0 minassas .
SFX 2843 Y 1
SFX 2843 0 anadas .
SFX 4060 Y 1
SFX 4060 0 scrivian .
SFX 4059 Y 1
SFX 4059 0 scrivias .
SFX 1727 Y 1
SFX 1727 0 gnavan .
SFX 1726 Y 1
SFX 1726 0 gnavas .
SFX 449 Y 1
SFX 449 0 lescha .
SFX 569 Y 1
SFX 569 0 almain .
SFX 778 Y 1
SFX 778 0 mai .
SFX 2175 Y 1
SFX 2175 0 mal .
SFX 1485 Y 1
SFX 1485 0 man .
SFX 742 Y 1
SFX 742 0 mar .
SFX 902 Y 1
SFX 902 0 mas .
SFX 1864 Y 1
SFX 1864 0 mat .
SFX 493 Y 1
SFX 493 0 inai .
SFX 1699 Y 1
SFX 1699 0 inal .
SFX 1006 Y 1
SFX 1006 0 inan .
SFX 4361 Y 1
SFX 4361 0 mpian .
SFX 468 Y 1
SFX 468 0 inar .
SFX 337 Y 1
SFX 337 0 inas .
SFX 4360 Y 1
SFX 4360 0 mpias .
SFX 2332 Y 1
SFX 2332 0 zzia .
SFX 1111 Y 1
SFX 1111 0 tgia .
SFX 3004 Y 1
SFX 3004 0 tgin .
SFX 1817 Y 1
SFX 1817 0 tgir .
SFX 3002 Y 1
SFX 3002 0 tgis .
SFX 2031 Y 1
SFX 2031 0 uond .
SFX 2365 Y 1
SFX 2365 0 vain .
SFX 2364 Y 1
SFX 2364 0 vais .
SFX 3913 Y 1
SFX 3913 0 tifitgescha .
SFX 4021 Y 1
SFX 4021 0 siunavan .
SFX 4020 Y 1
SFX 4020 0 siunavas .
SFX 3573 Y 1
SFX 3573 0 anassan .
SFX 3572 Y 1
SFX 3572 0 anassas .
SFX 2722 Y 1
SFX 2722 0 erass .
SFX 4396 Y 1
SFX 4396 0 mel .
SFX 3978 Y 1
SFX 3978 0 sura .
SFX 3214 Y 1
SFX 3214 0 mer .
SFX 1862 Y 1
SFX 1862 0 met .
SFX 4537 Y 1
SFX 4537 0 iner .
SFX 3729 Y 1
SFX 3729 0 unalisadas .
SFX 914 Y 1
SFX 914 0 iaziun .
SFX 2311 Y 1
SFX 2311 0 della .
SFX 3668 Y 1
SFX 3668 0 upleschia .
SFX 1620 Y 1
SFX 1620 0 risesch .
SFX 426 Y 1
SFX 426 0 aders .
SFX 1369 Y 1
SFX 1369 0 itaziun .
SFX 2719 Y 1
SFX 2719 0 erava .
SFX 3531 Y 1
SFX 3531 0 ccass .
SFX 732 Y 1
SFX 732 0 ativa .
SFX 1615 Y 1
SFX 1615 0 riseschian .
SFX 595 Y 1
SFX 595 0 lisadas .
SFX 1614 Y 1
SFX 1614 0 riseschias .
SFX 3554 Y 1
SFX 3554 0 ativs .
SFX 1782 Y 1
SFX 1782 0 vant .
SFX 2790 Y 1
SFX 2790 0 bina .
SFX 4529 Y 1
SFX 4529 0 isanat .
SFX 3286 Y 1
SFX 3286 0 ilitad .
SFX 1137 Y 1
SFX 1137 0 mia .
SFX 3212 Y 1
SFX 3212 0 mic .
SFX 1644 Y 1
SFX 1644 0 min .
SFX 962 Y 1
SFX 962 0 inia .
SFX 3584 Y 1
SFX 3584 0 alavan .
SFX 3583 Y 1
SFX 3583 0 alavas .
SFX 3351 Y 1
SFX 3351 0 gera .
SFX 3528 Y 1
SFX 3528 0 ccava .
SFX 559 Y 1
SFX 559 0 cavan .
SFX 558 Y 1
SFX 558 0 cavas .
SFX 3240 Y 1
SFX 3240 0 itschas .
SFX 1765 Y 1
SFX 1765 0 arola .
SFX 4802 Y 1
SFX 4802 0 ectur .
SFX 2021 Y 1
SFX 2021 0 vart .
SFX 2886 Y 1
SFX 2886 0 vass .
SFX 1972 Y 1
SFX 1972 0 zzavan .
SFX 1971 Y 1
SFX 1971 0 zzavas .
SFX 361 Y 1
SFX 361 0 ischem .
SFX 886 Y 1
SFX 886 0 tidas .
SFX 1673 Y 1
SFX 1673 0 ivels .
SFX 1937 Y 1
SFX 1937 0 chetta .
SFX 2885 Y 1
SFX 2885 0 vava .
SFX 3193 Y 1
SFX 3193 0 mpa .
SFX 999 Y 1
SFX 999 0 resch .
SFX 2776 Y 1
SFX 2776 0 clond .
SFX 3075 Y 1
SFX 3075 0 scopic .
SFX 216 Y 1
SFX 216 0 iassan .
SFX 215 Y 1
SFX 215 0 iassas .
SFX 1535 Y 1
SFX 1535 0 itesch .
SFX 1324 Y 1
SFX 1324 0 uradas .
SFX 3187 Y 1
SFX 3187 0 naziunal .
SFX 2996 Y 1
SFX 2996 0 tider .
SFX 1827 Y 1
SFX 1827 0 ssian .
SFX 3060 Y 1
SFX 3060 0 ssias .
SFX 1145 Y 1
SFX 1145 0 itassan .
SFX 1144 Y 1
SFX 1144 0 itassas .
SFX 2757 Y 1
SFX 2757 0 drai .
SFX 4828 Y 1
SFX 4828 0 dran .
SFX 2196 Y 1
SFX 2196 0 itgadas .
SFX 2754 Y 1
SFX 2754 0 drar .
SFX 1019 Y 1
SFX 1019 0 dras .
SFX 3264 Y 1
SFX 3264 0 insa .
SFX 2078 Y 1
SFX 2078 0 tgesch .
SFX 2616 Y 1
SFX 2616 0 inta .
SFX 582 Y 1
SFX 582 0 liseschan .
