browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.dic
Albi/465,4729
cla/2,65,98,194,235,291,517,705,742,778,824,864,883,903,940,946,947,948,949,950,951,952,953,1636,1776,2024,2286,2345,2524,2878,2880,3225,3539,3645,4014
cump/965,1000,1373,1488,2595,2629,2630,2631,2632,2633,2634,2636,2637,2638,3284,3287,3288,3289,3290,3291,3292,3293,3294,3295,3296,3297,3413,3602,4451,4551
demon/138,140,142,150,157,158,160,161,163,166,167,168,169,170,171,194,316,317,318,319,320,332,333,575,1242,1603,2086,3025,3026,3027,3028,3029,3030,3031,3032,3033,3034,3035,3036,3037,3038,3039,3040,3041,3042,3982,3983
d'in/5,858,1240,2011,2022,2124,2398,2881,2882,2962,3236,3349,3451,4822,4905
doct/4263,4265
end/153,314,329,330,340,341,342,343,344,345,346,347,348,349,355,356,439,1393,1394,1395,1396,1397,2142,2298,2299,3558,4235,4964,4971,4972,4973,4974,4975,4976,4978,4979,4980,4981,4982,4983,4984
for/3,4,5,6,7,8,56,60,143,179,201,243,248,292,306,351,606,1239,1608,2392,2963,2993,2994,2995,3800,3907,3908,3909,3910,3911,3912,3913,3914,3915,3916,3917,3918,3919,3920,3921,3922,3923,3924,3925,3926
funcziun/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,78,146,153,191,217,224,252,366,456,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,504,505,506,507,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,515,733,734,2323
in'/146,192,331,1756,1768,2818,4509,4799,4963
latin/3,5,64,95,106,109,110,113,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,127,128,129,130,131,134,1809,3579
metta/2175
mir/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,60,82,83,99,190,631,1199,2884
mister/15,1138,3238
mort/366,569,1277,1883,4261,4581
nar/1,244,1883,3110,3651,3945
padrin/30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,315
palp/68,154,426,985,1639,1848,1969,2141,4282,4283,4284,4285,4532
paragraf/30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59
pled/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,10,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,49,50,51,52,58,59,70,136,141,195,224,254,314,329,330,340,341,342,343,344,345,346,347,348,349,355,356,377,378,379,380,426,733,1393,1394,1395,1396,1397,1969
porta/542,806,1351,1483,2053,2108,2167,2287,4837,4899
possess/192,196,400,957,1474
pro/13,16,18,55,75,172,185,201,321,528,546,743,839,1030,1044,1048,1071,1171,1411,1471,2012,2014,2105,2160,2467,2516,2985,3010,3074,3086,3446,3638,3986,4143,4144,4194,4195,4645
problem/1,102,1408,3556
profess/30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,57,58,59,181,192,211,641,2541
puli/1,2,11,12,13,14,16,17,18,19,22,24,56,60,61,185,249,440,1288,1822,3129,3438,3540
punct/1,10,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,68,70,178,183,674,884,1328,1329,1330,1331,1332,1333,1334,1425,1585,1796,2031,2038,2039,2040,2041,2042,2043,2045,2046,2047,2048,2049,2050,2051,2946
quadr/3,4,5,6,7,8,10,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,68,80,102,105,177,303,366,452,627,643,880,910,926,927,1099,1373,1543,2030,3416,3665,3666,3667,3668,3669,3670,3671,3672,3673,3674,3675,3676,3677,3678,3679,3680,3681,3682,3683,3684,3685,3686,3687,4995,4996,4997
scur/210,218,223,227,231,232,233,238,239,241,244,519,521,522,542,543,574,609,610,611,613,614,616,636,888,889,988,990,991,1032,1033,1034,1035,1036,1037,1039,1041,1122,1256,2405,2838
servi/600,721,1049,2052
sfarlat/60,82,138,140,142,150,157,158,159,160,161,163,164,166,167,168,169,170,171,173,175,572,702,1031,1112,1113,1208
sigil/1,210,223,227,233,241
stip/5,406,739,773,840,850,851
super/30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,68,107,154,1243,1469,2012,2375,3195,3223,3239,3901,3984,4189,4471,4472
tem/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,71,72,73,74,85,94,97,98,100,101,103,104,351,472,482,880,1408,1468,1841,2534,2535,2536,2795,2796,2797,2798,2799,2800,2801,2802,2803,2804,2805,2806,2807,2808,2809,2810,2811,2812,2813,2814,2815,2816,3555,3556,4342,4967
tera/464,480,523,3868,4186
tib/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,77,79,156,210,218,222,223,227,228,229,230,231,232,233,238,239,240,241,253,262,302,353
tschitschan/3442
ultima/2393
unda/1029
urna/1,774
vasal/3228,4458
vasch/954,1364,2655,3443,4432
